Hawaii, session 2025, GM1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that sex offenders
present an extreme threat to public safety due to high rates of
sexual recidivism. To mitigate this threat, Hawaii established
covered offender registration laws to require the public release
of relevant information concerning the presence of convicted sex
offenders in the community.
The legislature further finds that there are certain gaps
under the current registration laws for sexual offenses,
including offenses committed against minors. For example, the
public disclosure of registration information is not required
for an offender who, while acting in a professional capacity,
commits the offense of sexual assault in the fourth degree
against a minor who is at least sixteen years of age. This
omission would allow these sex offenders, who abused their
position of trust, power, authority, or supervision to engage in
sexual contact with a minor, to evade public detection and
continue to prey upon children in the community.
2025-3491 HB359 GDI HMSO
IIIIHIMHIIIOIHin

Page 2 H.B. NO 359
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to amend the
covered offender registration laws to:
(1) Include offenders who commit the offense of:
(A) Sexual assault in the fourth degree by exposing
the offender's genitals to another person under
circumstances in which the offender's conduct is
likely to alarm the other person or put the other
person in fear of bodily injury;
(B) Sexual assault in the fourth degree against a
minor who is at least sixteen years old while the
offender is acting in a professional capacity;
(C) Incest;
(D) Sexual assault of an animal; or
(E) Use a computer in the commission of a separate
crime, wherein the separate crime is a covered
offense subject to covered offender registration
laws;
(2) Require public disclosure for covered offenses that
are committed against minors, regardless of whether
the conviction was for a first-time misdemeanor
offense;
2025-3491 HB359 GDI HMSO :

Page 3 H.B. NO.
I I . . I . g 2
C.D. 1
(3) Clarify that a person who is required to report their
location of residence in person every year under the
covered offender registration requirements shall
report during the thirty-day period following the
offender's birthday, rather than the offender's actual
date of birth; and
(4) Specify how certain covered offenses are to be tiered
for purposes of seeking termination of registration
requirements.
SECTION 2. Section 846E-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "sexual offense" to read
as follows:
""Sexual offense" means an offense that is:
(1) Set forth in section 707-730(1), 707-731(1),
707-732(1), 707-733 (1) (a), (b), or (d), 707-733.6,
7072741^jm;2il09^ 712-1200.5 (4) , 712-1202(1), or
712-1203(1), but excludes conduct that is criminal
[only bocausG of the—age—of the victim/—as provided
ift] pursuant to section 707-730(1)(b), [or section]
707-732(1) (b), or 707-741, if the perpetrator is under
the age of eighteen [-^], and also excludes conduct that
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO 3
MIIHIilHnH

Page 4 H.B. NO. S.2
C.D. 1
is criminal pursuant to section 707-733(1) (b) or (d)
if the perpetrator is under the age of twenty-five at
the time of the offense;
(2) An act defined in section 707-720 if the charging
document for the offense for which there has been a
conviction alleged intent to subject the victim to a
sexual offense;
(3) An act that consists of:
(A) Criminal sexual conduct toward a minor, including
but not limited to an offense set forth in
section 707-759;
(B) Solicitation of a minor who is less than fourteen
years old to engage in sexual conduct;
(C) Use of a minor in a sexual performance;
(D) Production, distribution, or possession of child
pornography chargeable as a felony under section
707-750, 707-751, or 707-752;
(E) Electronic enticement of a child chargeable under
section 707-756 or 707-757 if the offense was
committed with the intent to promote or
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO
■MMnMWRIMUiim

Page 5 H.B. NO 359
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
facilitate the commission of another covered
offense as defined in this section; or
(F) Commercial sexual exploitation of a minor in
violation of section 712-1209.1;
(4) A violation of privacy under section 711-1110.9;
(5) An act that consists of use of a computer in the
commission of a separate crime under section 708-893,
wherein the separate crime is a covered offense, as
defined in this section;
[-W-] An act, as described in chapter 705, that is an
attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy
to commit one of the offenses designated in paragraphs
(1) through [ (4-)-^] (5) ;
[4^] (7) A criminal offense that is comparable to or that
exceeds a sexual offense as defined in paragraphs (1)
through [(5);] (6); or
[-m-] (8) Any federal, military, out-of-state, tribal, or
foreign conviction for any offense that under the laws
of this State would be a sexual offense as defined in
paragraphs (1) through [-(6) .-] (7) ."
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO

IlilHIIIIHilMIIHBI

Page 6
H.B. NO.
hb.
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. Section 846E-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (h) to read as follows:
"(h) If a covered offender has been convicted of only one
covered offense and that covered offense is a misdemeanor [7-] and
was not committed against a minor, the covered offender shall
not be subject to the public access requirements set forth in
this section."
SECTION 4. Section 846E-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) A person commits the offense of failure to comply
with covered offender registration requirements if the person is
required to register under this chapter and the person
intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly:
(1) Fails to register with the attorney general by
providing to the attorney general or the Hawaii
criminal justice data center the person's registration
information;
(2) Fails to report in person every five years until
June 30, 2009, and beginning on July 1, 2009, once
every year, during the thirty-day period following the
offender’s [date - of b-irth/ ] birthday to the chief of
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO C
■niiiMiiHin

Page 7 H.B. NO.
^02
C.D. 1
police where the covered offender's residence is
located, or to such other department or agency
designated by the attorney general;
(3) While reporting to the chief of police or such other
department or agency designated by the attorney
general, fails to correct information in the registry
within the offender's knowledge that has changed or is
inaccurate regarding information required by section
846E-2(d)(1) through (12);
(4) While reporting to the chief of police or such other
department or agency designated by the attorney
general, fails to provide new information that may be
required by section 846E-2(d)(1) through (12);
(5) While reporting to the chief of police or such other
department or agency desi.gnated by the attorney
general, does not allow the police or other designated
department or agency to take a current photograph of
the person;
(6) Fails to register in person with the chief of police
having jurisdiction of the area where the covered
offender resides or is present within three working
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO

Page 8 H.B. NO. g-
C.D. 1
days whenever the provisions of section 846E-2 (g)
require the person to do so;
(7) Fails to notify the attorney general or the Hawaii
criminal justice data center of a change of any of the
covered offender's registration information in writing
within three working days of the change;
(8) Provides false registration information to the
attorney general, the Hawaii criminal justice data
center, or a chief of police;
(9) Signs a statement verifying that all of the
registration information is accurate and current when
any of the registration information is not
substantially accurate and current;
(10) Having failed to establish a new residence within the
ten days while absent from the person's registered
residence for ten or more dayS2_ fails to notify the
attorney general in writing within three working days
of the covered offender's current residence
information;
(11) Fails to mail or deliver the periodic verification of
registration information form to the attorney general
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO !
liiniiiiiiiiiiniiii

Page 9 H.B. NO. 359
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
within ten days of receipt, as required by section
846E-5; provided that it shall be an affirmative
defense that the periodic verification form mailed to
the covered offender was delivered when the covered
offender was absent from the registered address and
the covered offender had previously notified the
Hawaii criminal justice data center that the covered
offender would be absent during the period that the
periodic verification form was delivered; or
(12) Fails to report to the chief of police where the
covered offender resides, or to such other department
or agency that may be designated by the attorney
general in rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91,
during the first week of the months of January, April,
July, and October of every year, and verify and update
the covered offender's registration information as
required by section 846E-5(b)."
SECTION 5. Section 846E-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§846E-10 Termination of registration requirements. (a)
Tier 3 offenses. A covered offender whose covered offense is
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO
■■UiiHllill

Page 10 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
any of the following offenses shall register for life and,
except as provided in subsection [ (c) /—raay] (f) , shall not
petition the court, in a civil proceeding, for termination of
registration requirements:
(1) Any offense set forth in section 707-730(1) (a), (b) ,
(d) , or (e); 707-731 (1) (a) or (b); 707-732 (1) (a), (b),
or (g); or 707-733.6;
(2) An offense set forth in section 707-720; provided that
the offense involves kidnapping of a minor by someone
other than a parent;
(3) An offense that is an attempt, criminal solicitation,
or criminal conspiracy to commit any of the offenses
in paragraph (1) or (2);
(4) Any criminal offense that is comparable to one of the
offenses in paragraph (1), (2), or (3); or
(5) Any federal, military, out-of-state, tribal, or
foreign offense that is comparable to one of the
offenses in paragraph (1), (2), or (3).
(b) A repeat covered offender shall register for life and,
except as provided in subsection [-(eH—mety] (f) , shall not
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO 10
■IlillHMIIIHIIIinill

Page 11 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
petition the court, in a civil proceeding, for termination of
registration requirements.
(c) Tier 2 offenses. A covered offender who has
maintained a clean record for the previous twenty-five years,
excluding any time the offender was in custody or civilly
committed, and who has substantially complied with the
registration requirements of this chapter for the previous
twenty-five years, or for the portion of that twenty-five years
that this chapter has been applicable, and who is not a repeat
covered offender may petition the court, in a civil proceeding,
for termination of registration requirements; provided that the
covered offender's most serious covered offense is one of the
following:
(1) Any offense set forth in section 707-730(1) (c),
707-731 (1) (c)
[t]
or (d), 707-732 (1) (c), 707-750,
707-751, 712-1202, or 712-1203(1)(b), as section
712-1203(1) (b) read before its amendment pursuant to
section 9 of Act 147, Session Laws of Hawaii 2008;
(2) An offense set forth in section 707-720; provided that
the charging document for the offense for which there
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO 11
■MMinimu

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
has been a conviction alleged intent to subject the
victim to a sexual offense;
(3) An offense set forth in section 707-756 that includes
an intent to promote or facilitate the commission of
another felony covered offense as defined in section
846E-1;
(4) An offense that is an attempt, criminal solicitation,
or criminal conspiracy to commit any of the offenses
in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) ;
(5) Any criminal offense that is comparable to one of the
offenses in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4); or
(6) Any federal, military, out-of-state, tribal, or
foreign offense that is comparable to one of the
offenses in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4).
(d) Tier 1 offenses. A covered offender who has
maintained a clean record for the previous ten years, excluding
any time the offender was in custody or civilly committed, and
who has substantially complied with the registration
requirements of this chapter for the previous ten years, or for
the portion of that ten years that this chapter has been
applicable, and who is not a repeat covered offender may
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO
IIMHMililHMIM

Page 13 H.B. NO. ga
C.D. 1
petition the court, in a civil proceeding, for termination of
registration requirements; provided that the covered offender's
most serious covered offense is one of the following:
(1) Any offense set forth in section 707-732(1) (d), (e),
or (f); 707-733 (1) (a) [-^1, (b) , or (d) ; 707-741;
707-752; 707-759; 711^21109^711-1110.9; 712-1203(1);
or 712-1209.1;
(2) An offense set forth in section 707-721 or 707-722;
provided that the offense involves unlawful
imprisonment of a minor by someone other than a
II parent;
(3) An offense set forth in section 707-757 that includes
an intent to promote or facilitate the commission of
another covered offense as defined in section 846E-1;
(4) An offense that is an attempt, criminal solicitation,
or criminal conspiracy to commit any of the offenses
in paragraph (1), (2), or (3);
(5) Any criminal offense that is comparable to one of the
offenses in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4);
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO 13

Page 14 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) Any federal, military, out-of-state, tribal, or
foreign offense that is comparable to one of the
offenses in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4); or
(7) Any other covered offense that is not specified in
subsection (a) or (c) or paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4),
(5) , or (6) .
(e) If the covered offender's most serious covered offense
is set forth in section 708-893, then the designated tier of the
separate crime as provided in section 708-893, shall set forth
the covered offender's appropriate termination of registration
requirements.
[ (e-)-] (f) Notwithstanding any other provisions in this
section, any covered offender, forty years after the covered
offender's date of release or sentencing, whichever is later,
for the covered offender's most recent covered offense, may
petition the court, in a civil proceeding, for termination of
registration requirements.
[■(f ) ] (g) In the civil proceeding for termination of
registration requirements, the State shall be represented by the
attorney general; provided that the attorney general, with the
prosecuting agency's consent, may designate the prosecuting
2025-3491 HB359 GDI HMSO 14
lllllllilMilllllllllllll

Page 15 H.B. NO 359
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
agency that prosecuted the covered offender for the most recent
covered offense within the State to represent the State. For
covered offenders who have never been convicted of a covered
offense within the State, the attorney general shall represent
the State; provided that the attorney general, with the
prosecuting agency's consent, may designate the prosecuting
agency for the county in which the covered offender resides to
represent the State. The court may order this termination upon
substantial evidence and more than proof by a preponderance of
the evidence that:
(1) The covered offender has met the statutory
requirements of eligibility to petition for
termination;
(2) The covered offender has substantially complied with
registration requirements;
(3) The covered offender is very unlikely to commit a
covered offense ever again; and
(4) Registration by the covered offender will not assist
in protecting the safety of the public or any member
thereof.
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO 15
UIIUNIIilliHllllllli

Page 16 H.B. NO 359
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
[(g) ] (h) A person who does not meet the criteria for
registration as a covered offender under the laws of this State,
but is subject to registration pursuant to section 846E-2(b),
may petition the court, in a civil proceeding, for termination
of registration requirements; provided that the person has
maintained a clean record for the previous ten years, excluding
any time the person was in custody or civilly committed; has
substantially complied with the registration requirements of
this chapter for the previous ten years; and was not designated
a repeat covered offender in any state or jurisdiction. The
attorney general shall represent the State; provided that the
attorney general, with the prosecuting agency's consent, may
designate the prosecuting agency for the county in which the
person resides to represent the State. The court may order this
termination upon substantial evidence and more than proof by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) The person has met the statutory requirements of
eligibility to petition for termination;
(2) The person has substantially complied with
registration requirements;
2025-3491 HB359 GDI HMSO
lillllHIilllHIIHIinill

Page 17 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(3) The person is very unlikely to commit a covered
offense; and
(4) Registration by the person will not assist in
protecting the safety of the public or any member
thereof.
(i) A denial by the court for relief pursuant to a
petition under this section shall preclude the filing of another
petition for five years from the date of the most recent
denial."
SECTION 6. This Act shall not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties and forfeitures that were incurred, and
proceedings that were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3491 HB359 CDl HMSO 17
liliillMHIIHIIin

H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
APPROVED this day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 359, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 359, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate